static/hunspell/15.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O55 Y 214 # N06 Abe+
SFX O55 0 ҙәр .	+Pl
SFX O55 0 ҙең .	+Gen
SFX O55 0 гә .	+Dat
SFX O55 0 ҙе .	+Acc
SFX O55 0 ҙән .	+Abl
SFX O55 0 ҙә .	+Loc
SFX O55 0 ҙеңме .	+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 гәме .	+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙеме .	+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙәнме .	+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙәме .	+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙеңдер .	+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 гәлер .	+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙелер .	+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙәндер .	+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙәлер .	+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙеңсе .	+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 гәсе .	+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙесе .	+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙәнсе .	+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙәсе .	+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 мен .	+Pred1Sg
SFX O55 0 һең .	+Pred2Sg
SFX O55 0 беҙ .	+Pred1Pl
SFX O55 0 һегеҙ .	+Pred2Pl
SFX O55 0 менме .	+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX O55 0 һеңме .	+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX O55 0 беҙме .	+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX O55 0 һегеҙме .	+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX O55 0 мендер .	+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX O55 0 һеңдер .	+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX O55 0 беҙҙер .	+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX O55 0 һегеҙҙер .	+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX O55 0 менсе .	+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 һеңсе .	+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 беҙсе .	+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 һегеҙсе .	+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ем .	+PxSg1
SFX O55 0 ең .	+PxSg2
SFX O55 0 е .	+PxSg3
SFX O55 0 ебеҙ .	+PxPl1
SFX O55 0 егеҙ .	+PxPl2
SFX O55 0 емдең .	+PxSg1+Gen
SFX O55 0 еңдең .	+PxSg2+Gen
SFX O55 0 енең .	+PxSg3+Gen
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙең .	+PxPl1+Gen
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙең .	+PxPl2+Gen
SFX O55 0 емә .	+PxSg1+Dat
SFX O55 0 еңә .	+PxSg2+Dat
SFX O55 0 енә .	+PxSg3+Dat
SFX O55 0 ебеҙгә .	+PxPl1+Dat
SFX O55 0 егеҙгә .	+PxPl2+Dat
SFX O55 0 емде .	+PxSg1+Acc
SFX O55 0 еңде .	+PxSg2+Acc
SFX O55 0 ен .	+PxSg3+Acc
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙе .	+PxPl1+Acc
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙе .	+PxPl2+Acc
SFX O55 0 емдән .	+PxSg1+Abl
SFX O55 0 еңдән .	+PxSg2+Abl
SFX O55 0 енән .	+PxSg3+Abl
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙән .	+PxPl1+Abl
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙән .	+PxPl2+Abl
SFX O55 0 емдә .	+PxSg1+Loc
SFX O55 0 еңдә .	+PxSg2+Loc
SFX O55 0 ендә .	+PxSg3+Loc
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙә .	+PxPl1+Loc
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙә .	+PxPl2+Loc
SFX O55 0 емдеңме .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 еңдеңме .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 енеңме .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙеңме .	+PxPl1+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙеңме .	+PxPl2+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 емәме .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 еңәме .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 енәме .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 ебеҙгәме .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 егеҙгәме .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 емдеме .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 еңдеме .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 енме .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙеме .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙеме .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 емдәнме .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 еңдәнме .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 енәнме .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәнме .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәнме .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 емдәме .	+PxSg1+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 еңдәме .	+PxSg2+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 ендәме .	+PxSg3+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәме .	+PxPl1+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәме .	+PxPl2+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 емдеңмелер .	+PxSg1+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдеңмелер .	+PxSg2+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 енеңмелер .	+PxSg3+Gen+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙеңмелер .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙеңмелер .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емәмелер .	+PxSg1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңәмелер .	+PxSg2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 енәмелер .	+PxSg3+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙгәмелер .	+PxPl1+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙгәмелер .	+PxPl2+Dat+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдемелер .	+PxSg1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдемелер .	+PxSg2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 енмелер .	+PxSg3+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙемелер .	+PxPl1+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙемелер .	+PxPl2+Acc+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдәнмелер .	+PxSg1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдәнмелер .	+PxSg2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 енәнмелер .	+PxSg3+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәнмелер .	+PxPl1+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәнмелер .	+PxPl2+Abl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдәмелер .	+PxSg1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдәмелер .	+PxSg2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ендәмелер .	+PxSg3+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәмелер .	+PxPl1+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәмелер .	+PxPl2+Locl+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдеңдер .	+PxSg1+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдеңдер .	+PxSg2+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 енеңдер .	+PxSg3+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙеңдер .	+PxPl1+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙеңдер .	+PxPl2+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 емәлер .	+PxSg1+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңәлер .	+PxSg2+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 енәлер .	+PxSg3+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙгәлер .	+PxPl1+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙгәлер .	+PxPl2+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 емделер .	+PxSg1+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңделер .	+PxSg2+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ендер .	+PxSg3+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙелер .	+PxPl1+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙелер .	+PxPl2+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдәндер .	+PxSg1+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдәндер .	+PxSg2+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 енәндер .	+PxSg3+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәндер .	+PxPl1+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәндер .	+PxPl2+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдәлер .	+PxSg1+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдәлер .	+PxSg2+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ендәлер .	+PxSg3+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәлер .	+PxPl1+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәлер .	+PxPl2+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдеңсе .	+PxSg1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 еңдеңсе .	+PxSg2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 енеңсе .	+PxSg3+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙеңсе .	+PxPl1+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙеңсе .	+PxPl2+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 емәсе .	+PxSg1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 еңәсе .	+PxSg2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 енәсе .	+PxSg3+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ебеҙгәсе .	+PxPl1+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 егеҙгәсе .	+PxPl2+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 емдесе .	+PxSg1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 еңдесе .	+PxSg2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 енсе .	+PxSg3+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙесе .	+PxPl1+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙесе .	+PxPl2+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 емдәнсе .	+PxSg1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 еңдәнсе .	+PxSg2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 енәнсе .	+PxSg3+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәнсе .	+PxPl1+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәнсе .	+PxPl2+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 емдәсе .	+PxSg1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 еңдәсе .	+PxSg2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ендәсе .	+PxSg3+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙәсе .	+PxPl1+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙәсе .	+PxPl2+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 емме .	+PxSg1+Q
SFX O55 0 еңме .	+PxSg2+Q
SFX O55 0 еме .	+PxSg3+Q
SFX O55 0 ебеҙме .	+PxPl1+Q
SFX O55 0 егеҙме .	+PxPl2+Q
SFX O55 0 еммелер .	+PxSg1+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңмелер .	+PxSg2+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емелер .	+PxSg3+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙмелер .	+PxPl1+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙмелер .	+PxPl2+Q+Indf
SFX O55 0 емдер .	+PxSg1+Indf
SFX O55 0 еңдер .	+PxSg2+Indf
SFX O55 0 елер .	+PxSg3+Indf
SFX O55 0 ебеҙҙер .	+PxPl1+Indf
SFX O55 0 егеҙҙер .	+PxPl2+Indf
SFX O55 0 емсе .	+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 еңсе .	+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 есе .	+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ебеҙсе .	+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 егеҙсе .	+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ме .	+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙер .	+Indf
SFX O55 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙеке .	+Poss
SFX O55 0 ҙекенең .	+Poss+Gen
SFX O55 0 ҙекенә .	+Poss+Dat
SFX O55 0 ҙекен .	+Poss+Acc
SFX O55 0 ҙекенән .	+Poss+Abl
SFX O55 0 ҙекендә .	+Poss+Loc
SFX O55 0 ҙекенеңме .	+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙекенәме .	+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙекенме .	+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙекенәнме .	+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙекендәме .	+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙекенеңдер .	+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙекенәлер .	+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙекендер .	+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙекенәндер .	+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙекендәлер .	+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙекенеңсе .	+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙекенәсе .	+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙекенсе .	+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙекенәнсе .	+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙекендәсе .	+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX O55 0 ҙекеме .	+Poss+Q
SFX O55 0 ҙекелер .	+Poss+Indf
SFX O55 0 ҙекесе .	+Poss+Clt/сы
